Wyoming, session 2025, HB0177.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-11-801 is created to read:

CHAPTER 11
STANDING AND SELECT COMMITTEES
HB0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0446

ARTICLE 8
FEDERAL REVIEW STANDING COMMITTEE

28-11-801. Creation of the federal review joint and
standing committee; powers and duties; reporting;
definitions.

(a) There is created the federal review joint and
standing committee. The president of the senate shall
appoint five (5) members of the senate and the speaker of
the house shall appoint nine (9) members of the house of
representatives to serve on the committee not later than
March 31 following each general election.

(b) The senate and the house of representatives
federal review joint and standing committee shall:

(i) Review any federal actions to determine if
the sovereignty of the state of Wyoming and the powers,
rights and liberties of its citizens, as legally defined
during the ratification debates of the several states in
ratifying the United States Constitution of 1787, are being
HB0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0446
infringed upon or diminished and ensure the Wyoming
legislature meets its constitutional obligation of
recognizing all infractions to the constitution of which
the state of Wyoming is a party;

(ii) Ascertain and make findings as to which
federal actions are not consistent with the enumerated
roles, responsibilities and powers of the United States
government in the United States constitution. This duty
shall be exercised without regard for any United States
supreme court or other judicial decisions that attempt to
interpret federal actions, such as unconstitutional
assertions assumed by the federal judiciary that undermine
our republican form of government, because only
legislatures can create and revoke laws;

(iii) Report to and submit recommendations to
the legislature, including sponsoring legislation,
declarations, resolutions and communications with sister
states, consistent with any determinations and findings
made by the committee concerning the constitutionality of
federal actions.

HB0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0446
(c) For purposes of this section, "federal action"
means all new, proposed and existing federal laws,
resolutions, rules, regulations, decrees, orders, mandates,
executive orders and any other federal dictate having the
force and effect of law.

(d) This section shall be repealed upon the repeal of
the Seventeenth Amendment to the United States
Constitution.

Section 2. The president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
members to the federal review joint and standing committee
not later than January 6, 2026.

Section 3. House and Senate need to adopt rules to
implement this act.

HB0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0446
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0177